Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.630

Sealing of open holes and mine shafts.

The department shall work with federal officials and private mine owners to ensure the prompt sealing of open holes and mine shafts that constitute a threat to safety.

[ 2003 c 334 s 101; 1985 c 459 s 7. Formerly RCW 43.12.025.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.

Severability—1985 c 459: See note following RCW 79.14.510.